Hawaii statutes.
[§431:10H-232] Prohibition against
preexisting conditions and probationary periods in replacement policies and
certificates. If a long-term care insurance policy or certificate replaces
another long-term care insurance policy or certificate, the replacing issuer
shall waive any time periods applicable to preexisting conditions and
probationary periods in the new long-term care policy for similar benefits to
the extent that similar exclusions have been satisfied under the original
policy. [L 1999, c 93, pt of §2]

Previous
Vol09_Ch0431-0435H
Next